Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-403
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 9-404 to 9-417.02 shall be used.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 124;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 95;

Laws 2003, LB 3, § 3.